Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
201E

HOUSING
FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

REPEALED. L 1997, c 350, §18.

Note

L 1998, c 272, §3
purports to amend §§201E-61 and 201E-221.

Cross References

For present
provisions, see chapter 201G.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next